Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1431.03
Act of domestic violence; change of locks; requirements.

(1) When an act of domestic violence is perpetrated against a tenant or household member by someone who is not a cotenant or occupant of the same dwelling unit, the tenant may require the landlord to change the lock to the tenant's dwelling unit pursuant to section 76-1431.04 if the tenant or household member has:

(a) Obtained a protective order, restraining order, or other similar relief which applies to the perpetrator of the act of domestic violence; or

(b) Obtained certification confirming domestic violence as set forth in subdivision (5)(a)(iii) of section 76-1431.

(2) To have a lock changed under this section, the tenant shall:

(a) Provide the landlord a copy of the documentation described in subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Provide the landlord a written notice containing the request that the locks be changed immediately.

(3) The landlord shall change the locks to the tenant's dwelling unit as provided in section 76-1431.04 within twenty-four hours after receiving the tenant's written request.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 49.